Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2705.04
Record of sales tax permits; electronic
access; fees.

The record of sales tax permits maintained
by the Department of Revenue may be made available electronically through
the portal established under section
84-1204. There shall be a fee of five dollars and fifty cents for a monthly
listing of all new sales tax permits. All fees collected pursuant to this
section for electronic access to records through the portal shall
be deposited in the Records Management Cash Fund and shall be distributed
as provided in any agreements between the State Records Board and the department.

Laws 1998, LB 924, § 29;

Laws 2012, LB719, § 5.